hyphen-patterns/frhyph.txt
% patterns, codage iso-latin-9 !
'é4
'â4
'ê4
'î4
'ô4
'û4
'è4
'a2g3nat
'a4
'ab3réa
'ae3s4ch
'amino1a2c
'ana3s4tr
'anti1é2
'anti1a2
'anti1e2
'anti1s2
'anti2enne
'apo2s3ta
'ar3gent.
'ar3pent.
'as2ta
'e4
'en1a2
'en1o2
'eu2r1a2
'i2g3né
'i2g3ni
'i4
'in1é2
'in1a2
'in1e2
'in1i2
'in1o2
'in1s2tab
'in1u2
'in2é3lucta
'in2é3narra
'in2a3nit
'in2augur
'in2effab
'in2ept
'in2er
'in2exora
'in2i3miti
'in2i3q
'in2i3t
'in2o3cul
'in2ond
'in2u3l
'in2uit
'inte4r3
'interé2
'intera2
'intere2
'interi2
'intero2
'inters2
'interu2
'o4
'on3guent.
'oua1ou
'ovi1s2c
'u4
'y4
.é4
.émi3nent.
.â4
.ê4
.î4
.ô4
.û4
.è4
.a2g3nat
.a4
.ab3réa
.ae3s4ch
.amino1a2c
.ana3s4tr
.anti1é2
.anti1a2
.anti1e2
.anti1s2
.anti2enne
.apo2s3ta
.ar3dent.
.ar3gent.
.ar3pent.
.as2ta
.bai2se3main
.bi1a2c
.bi1a2t
.bi1au
.bi1u2
.bi2s1a2
.bio1a2
.ch4
.chè2vre3feuille
.ci2s1alp
.co1o2
.co2o3lie
.com3ment.
.con4
.cons4
.contre1s2c
.contre3maître
.cul4
.dé1a2
.dé1io
.dé1o2
.dé2s
.dé2s1é2
.dé2s1^^bd0
.dé2s1i2
.dé2s1u2n
.dé3s2é3gr
.dé3s2a3cr
.dé3s2a3tell
.dé3s2astr
.dé3s2c
.dé3s2ensib
.dé3s2ert
.dé3s2exu
.dé3s2i3d
.dé3s2i3gn
.dé3s2i3li
.dé3s2i3nen
.dé3s2i3r
.dé3s2invo
.dé3s2ist
.dé3s2o3dé
.dé3s2o3l
.dé3s2o3pil
.dé3s2orm
.dé3s2orp
.dé3s2oufr
.dé3s2p
.dé3s2t
.dés2a3m
.dacryo1a2
.di1a2cé
.di1a2cid
.di1a2mi
.di1a2tom
.di1ald
.di1e2n
.di2s3h
.do3lent.
.dy2s1a2
.dy2s1i2
.dy2s1o2
.dy2s1u2
.dy2s3
.e4
.en1a2
.en1o2
.eu2r1a2
.gem2ment.
.i2g3né
.i2g3ni
.i4
.in1é2
.in1a2
.in1e2
.in1i2
.in1o2
.in1s2tab
.in1u2
.in2é3lucta
.in2é3narra
.in2a3nit
.in2augur
.in2effab
.in2ept
.in2er
.in2exora
.in2i3miti
.in2i3q
.in2i3t
.in2o3cul
.in2ond
.in2u3l
.in2uit
.inte4r3
.interé2
.intera2
.intere2
.interi2
.intero2
.inters2
.interu2
.kh4
.la3tent.
.mé2g1oh
.mé2s1es
.mé2s1i
.mé2s1u2s
.mé2sa
.mé3san
.méta1s2ta
.ma2c3k
.ma2g3nicide
.ma2g3nificat
.ma2g3num
.ma2l1a2dres
.ma2l1a2dro
.ma2l1a2v
.ma2l1aisé
.ma2l1ap
.ma2l1en
.ma2l1int
.ma2l1o2d
.ma2l1oc
.ma2r1x
.macro1s2c
.milli1am
.mono1ï2dé
.mono1é2
.mono1a2
.mono1e2
.mono1i2
.mono1o2
.mono1s2
.mono1u2
.no2n1obs
.o4
.on3guent.
.oua1ou
.ovi1s2c
.péri1os
.péri1s2
.péri1u2
.péri2s3s
.péri2s3ta
.pa2n1a2f
.pa2n1a2mé
.pa2n1a2ra
.pa2n1is
.pa2n1o2ph
.pa2n1opt
.pa2r1a2chè
.pa2r1a2che
.pa2r3hé
.pa3rent.
.pa3tent.
.para1s2
.pe4r
.pen2ta
.per1é2
.per1a2
.per1e2
.per1i2
.per1o2
.per1u2
.ph4
.phalan3s2t
.pluri1a
.pon2tet
.pos2t1in
.pos2t1o2
.pos2t3h
.pos2t3r
.post1s2
.pré1é2
.pré1a2
.pré1e2
.pré1i2
.pré1o2
.pré1s2
.pré1u2
.pré2a3la
.pré2au
.pro1é2
.pro1s2cé
.pro2g3nath
.prou3d2h
.psycho1a2n
.pud1d2l
.ré1é2
.ré1a2
.ré1e2
.ré1i2
.ré1o2
.ré2èr
.ré2a3le
.ré2a3lis
.ré2a3lit
.ré2aux
.ré2el
.ré2er
.ré2i3fi
.ré2uss
.rétro1a2
.réu2
.re1s2
.re2s3cap
.re2s3cisi
.re2s3ciso
.re2s3cou
.re2s3cri
.re2s3pect
.re2s3pir
.re2s3plend
.re2s3pons
.re2s3quil
.re2s3s
.re2s3t
.re3s4tén
.re3s4tér
.re3s4tab
.re3s4tag
.re3s4tand
.re3s4tat
.re3s4tim
.re3s4tip
.re3s4toc
.re3s4top
.re3s4tr
.re3s4tu
.re3s4ty
.re4s5trein
.re4s5trict
.re4s5trin
.res3sent.
.sar3ment.
.sch4
.ser3ment.
.seu2le
.sh4
.sou3vent.
.sta2g3n
.stil3l
.su2b1é2
.su2b1a2
.su2b1in
.su2b1ur
.su2b3limin
.su2b3lin
.su2b3lu
.su2r1é2
.su2r1a2
.su2r1e2
.su2r1i2m
.su2r1inf
.su2r1int
.su2r1of
.su2r1ox
.su2r3h
.su3b2é3r
.su3b2alt
.su3r2a3t
.su3r2eau
.su3r2ell
.su3r2et
.syn2g3nath
.ta3lent.
.th4
.tri1a2c
.tri1a2n
.tri1a2t
.tri1o2n
.u4
.y4
1é2drie
1é2drique
1é2lément
1é2lectr
1é2nerg
1ç
1a2nesthési
1alcool
1b2l
1b2r
1bé
1bâ
1bê
1bî
1bô
1bû
1bè
1ba
1be
1bi
1bo
1bu
1by
1c2h
1c2k
1c2l
1c2r
1cé
1câ
1cê
1cî
1cô
1cû
1cè
1c^^bd0
1ca
1ce
1ci
1co
1cu
1cy
1d'
1d2r
1dé
1dâ
1dê
1dî
1dô
1dû
1dè
1da
1de
1di
1do
1du
1dy
1f2l
1f2r
1fé
1fâ
1fê
1fî
1fô
1fû
1fè
1fa
1fe
1fi
1fo
1fu
1fy
1g2ha
1g2he
1g2hi
1g2ho
1g2hy
1g2l
1g2n
1g2r
1gé
1gâ
1gê
1gî
1gô
1gû
1gè
1ga
1ge
1gi
1go
1gu
1gy
1hé
1hâ
1hê
1hî
1hô
1hû
1hè
1ha
1he
1hi
1ho
1hu
1hy
1informat
1j
1k2h
1k2r
1ké
1kâ
1kê
1kî
1kô
1kû
1kè
1ka
1ke
1ki
1ko
1ku
1ky
1lé
1lâ
1lê
1lî
1lô
1lû
1là
1lè
1la
1le
1li
1lo
1lu
1ly
1m2némo
1m2nési
1m2nès
1mé
1mâ
1mê
1mî
1mô
1mû
1mè
1m^^bd0
1ma
1me
1mi
1mo
1mu
1my
1né
1nâ
1nê
1nî
1nô
1nû
1nè
1n^^bd0
1na
1ne
1ni
1no
1nu
1ny
1octet
1p2h
1p2l
1p2né
1p2neu
1p2r
1p2sych
1p2tér
1p2tèr
1pé
1pâ
1pê
1pî
1pô
1pû
1pè
1pa
1pe
1pi
1po
1pu
1py
1q
1r2h
1ré
1râ
1rê
1rî
1rô
1rû
1rè
1ra
1re
1ri
1ro
1ru
1ry
1s2caph
1s2ch
1s2clér
1s2cop
1s2h
1s2lav
1s2lov
1s2patia
1s2perm
1s2phér
1s2phèr
1s2piel
1s2piros
1s2por
1s2tandard
1s2tein
1s2tigm
1s2tock
1s2tomos
1s2troph
1s2tructu
1s2tyle
1sé
1sâ
1sê
1sî
1sô
1sû
1sè
1s^^bd0
1sa
1se
1si
1so
1su
1sy
1t2h
1t2r
1té
1tâ
1tê
1tî
1tô
1tû
1tà
1tè
1ta
1te
1ti
1to
1tu
1ty
1v2r
1vé
1vâ
1vê
1vî
1vô
1vû
1vè
1va
1ve
1vi
1vo
1vu
1vy
1w2r
1wa
1we
1wi
1wo
1wu
1zé
1zè
1za
1ze
1zi
1zo
1zu
1zy
2'2
2bent.
2blent.
2brent.
2cent.
2chb
2chent.
2chg
2chm
2chn
2chp
2chs
2cht
2chw
2ck3h
2ckb
2ckent.
2ckf
2ckg
2ckp
2cks
2ckt
2clent.
2crent.
2dent.
2dlent.
2drent.
2fent.
2flent.
2frent.
2gent.
2glent.
2gnent.
2grent.
2guent.
2jent.
2jk
2kent.
2lent.
2nent.
2pent.
2phent.
2phn
2phs
2pht
2plent.
2prent.
2quent.
2r3heur
2r3hydr
2rent.
2s3hom
2schs
2sent.
2shent.
2shm
2shr
2shs
2t3heur
2tent.
2thl
2thm
2thn
2ths
2trent.
2vent.
2vrent.
2went.
2xent.
2zent.
3d2hal
3d2houd
3ph2talé
3ph2tis
4be.
4bes.
4ble.
4bles.
4bre.
4bres.
4ce.
4ces.
4ch.
4che.
4ches.
4chle.
4chles.
4chre.
4chres.
4ck.
4cke.
4ckes.
4cle.
4cles.
4cre.
4cres.
4de.
4des.
4dre.
4dres.
4fe.
4fes.
4fle.
4fles.
4fre.
4fres.
4ge.
4ges.
4gle.
4gles.
4gne.
4gnes.
4gre.
4gres.
4gue.
4gues.
4he.
4hes.
4je.
4jes.
4ke.
4kes.
4kh.
4le.
4les.
4me.
4mes.
4ne.
4nes.
4pe.
4pes.
4ph.
4phe.
4phes.
4phle.
4phles.
4phre.
4phres.
4ple.
4ples.
4pre.
4pres.
4que.
4ques.
4re.
4res.
4rhe.
4rhes.
4sch.
4sche.
4sches.
4se.
4ses.
4sh.
4she.
4shes.
4te.
4tes.
4th.
4the.
4thes.
4thre.
4thres.
4tre.
4tres.
4ve.
4ves.
4vre.
4vres.
4we.
4wes.
4ze.
4zes.
é3cent.
é3dent.
é3quent.
é3rent.
éci2ment.
écu2ment.
éd2hi
éli2ment.
élo3quent.
émil4l
éni3tent.
épi2s3cop
épi3s4cope
équipo3tent.
équiva4lent.
â2ment.
ô2ment.
è2ment.
.dé2s1^^bdOT
1c^^bdOT
1m^^bdOT
1n^^bdOT
1s^^bdOT
a1è2dre
a2g3nos
a2l1algi
a2s3tro
ab2h
ab3sent.
abî2ment.
absti3nent.
ac3cent.
acquies4cent.
ad2h
ai2ment.
amalga2ment.
ani2ment.
antifer3ment.
apo2s3tr
appa3rent.
ar2ment.
archi1é2pis
armil5l
as2ment.
au2ment.
avil4l
bou2ment.
boutil3l
bru2ment.
ca3ou3t2
capil3l
carê2ment.
cci3dent.
ch2l
ch2r
chevil4l
chien3dent.
chlo2r3é2t
chlo2r3a2c
chro2ment.
cil3l
cla2ment.
co1é2
co1a2d
co1acc
co1acq
co1ap
co1ar
co1assoc
co1assur
co1au
co1ax
co1ef
co1en
co1ex
co2g3niti
co2nurb
compé3tent.
confi3dent.
conni3vent.
conti3nent.
contin3gent.
corpu3lent.
cur3rent.
cyril3l
d1d2h
d1s2
déca3dent.
détri3ment.
da2ment.
di2s3cop
diaphrag2ment.
dili3gent.
dissi3dent.
distil3l
e2n1i2vr
e2s3ch
e2s3cop
entre3gent.
er2ment.
es3cent.
esti2ment.
eu1s2tat
extra1
extra2c
extra2i
f1s2
fécu3lent.
fa2ment.
fichu3ment.
fir2ment.
flam2ment.
fritil3l
fu2ment.
g1s2
gil3l
gram2ment.
grandilo3quent.
hémi1é
hémo1p2t
hil3l
hu2ment.
hype4r1
hyperé2
hypera2
hypere2
hyperi2
hypero2
hypers2
hyperu2
hypo1é2
hypo1a2
hypo1e2
hypo1i2
hypo1o2
hypo1s2
hypo1u2
i1è2dre
i1algi
i1arthr
i1oxy
i1s2tat
i2s3ché
i2s3chia
i2s3chio
ibril3l
il2l
imma3nent.
immi3nent.
immis4cent.
impo3tent.
impu3dent.
inci3dent.
indi3gent.
indo3lent.
indul3gent.
inno3cent.
inso3lent.
instil3l
intelli3gent.
inti2ment.
io1a2ct
is3cent.
iva3lent.
ja3cent.
l1s2t
l2ment.
l3lion
la2w3re
lil3l
llu2ment.
m1s2
mécon3tent.
mi2ment.
mil3l
mil4let
mit3tent.
mon2t3réal
monova3lent.
moye2n1â2g
munifi3cent.
n1x
n3s2at.
n3s2ats.
nutri3ment.
o1è2dre
o1d2l
o1ioni
o1s2téro
o1s2tas
o1s2tat
o1s2tim
o1s2tom
o1s2trad
o1s2tratu
o1s2triction
o2b3long
o2g3nomoni
o2g3nosi
om2ment.
ombud2s3
omni1s2
omnipo3tent.
opu3lent.
or2ment.
oxy1a2
pé1r2é2q
pé2nul
paléo1é2
papil3la
papil3le
papil3li
papil3lom
per3h
perma3nent.
perti3nent.
ph2l
ph2r
photo1s2
piril3l
plu2ment.
po1astre
poly1é2
poly1è2
poly1a2
poly1e2
poly1i2
poly1o2
poly1s2
poly1u2
polyva3lent.
pré3sent.
préémi3nent.
privatdo3cent.
privatdo3zent.
pro2s3tat
proémi3nent.
pru3dent.
pu2g3nable
pu2g3nac
pupil3l
pusil3l
qua2ment.
ré3gent.
réma3nent.
résur3gent.
réti3cent.
ra2ment.
radio1a2
rai3ment.
rcil4l
re3lent.
re3pent.
reli2ment.
ri2ment.
rin3gent.
rmil4l
ru3lent.
ryth2ment.
semil4l
ser3gent.
ser3pent.
sesqui1a2
slalo2ment.
sporu4lent.
stéréo1s2
su2ment.
su3r2ah
sub1s2
subli2ment.
succu3lent.
supe4r1
supero2
supers2
surémi3nent.
t1t2l
télé1e2
télé1i2
télé1o2b
télé1o2p
télé1s2
ta2ment.
tachy1a2
tan3gent.
tchin3t2
tempéra3ment.
ter3gent.
testa3ment.
th2r
thermo1s2
thril3l
to2ment.
tor3rent.
tran2s1a2
tran2s1o2
tran2s1u2
tran2s3h
tran2s3p
tran3s2act
tran3s2ats
transpa3rent.
tri3dent.
trucu3lent.
tu2ment.
tung2s3
turbu3lent.
u2s3tr
ucil4l
uevil4l
uni1a2x
uni1o2v
uvil4l
vélo1s2ki
vacil4l
vanil3lin
vanil3lis
veni2ment.
ventripo3tent.
vidi2ment.
vil3l
vol2t1amp
wa2g3n
xil3l
y1algi
y1asth
y1s2tom
